asheninka.guesser.script
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # delete all tags and special chars in surface forms     #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1  [["@EP"|"@EP@"|"@PHONPROC@"|"@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"|"@1SG.S"|"@2S"|"@3m.S"|"@3n.m.S"|"@1PL.S"|"@1SG.A"|"@2A"|"@3m.A"|"@3n.m.A"|"@1PL.A"|"@3n.m.O"|"@NPOSS"|"@AGTCAUS@"|"@MP@"|"@I@"|"@NI@"|"@NVowel@"|"@VPERS@"|"@NMZ@"|"@ALNPOSS@"|"@IDIM@"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@EP"|"@EP@"|"@PHONPROC@"|"@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"|"@1SG.S"|"@2S"|"@3m.S"|"@3n.m.S"|"@1PL.S"|"@1SG.A"|"@2A"|"@3m.A"|"@3n.m.A"|"@1PL.A"|"@3n.m.O"|"@NPOSS"|"@AGTCAUS@"|"@MP@"|"@I@"|"@NI@"|"@NVowel@"|"@VPERS@"|"@NMZ@"|"@ALNPOSS@"|"@IDIM@"]];
       define Cleanup [Cleanup2];

       define VowelRoot [a|e|i|o|á|é|í|ó|A|E|I|O|Á|É|Í|Ó];
       define ConsRoot [b|c|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|x|y|z|B|C|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|P|Q|R|S|T|V|X|Y|Z];

      source orthography.foma 

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #          Verbs         #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      source v-p-1.foma
      source v-p-2.foma

      define Pref [ [P=1 P=2] | [P=1] | [P=2=SET3] ] ;

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #   'Empty Morph' is a   #
      #   sort of epenthesis   #
      #                        #
      ##########################

#      define AEpenthesisRule1 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => t _ v ]; # kentavaetantsi / =kent -a -vae -t -antsi 
#      define AEpenthesisRule2 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => r _ y ]; 

#      define AEpenthesisRule3 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => s _ [r|v|k] ]; # pinkatsari ??? , i-kis-a-kamari-t-an-ak-a
#      define AEpenthesisRule4 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => k _ m ]; # notoncamento
#      define AEpenthesisRule5 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => t _ m ]; # itotamento
#      define AEpenthesisRule6 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => k _ n ]; # notyoonkantsi
#      define AEpenthesisRule7 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => k _ v ]; # pokabaetantsi
#      define AEpenthesisRule8 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => p _ v ]; # Pabaetantsi
#      define AEpenthesisRule9 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => v _ [v|h|{ch}|{ts}] ]; # Ob-a-bae-t-antsi, i-=tiyerov-a-hei-t-ati-ya 
#      define AEpenthesisRule10 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => r _ [v|p] ]; # irabaetantsi, n-=ir-a-piro-t-i-ro 
#      define AEpenthesisRule11 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => m _ [v|n] ]; # timabaetantsi, quem-a-nen-t-aantsi
#      define AEpenthesisRule12 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => k _ [h|y|r|p|t|a] ]; # i-vitsik-a-jee-tz-i-ri, betsik-a-ye-t-atsi-ri, o-tsimank-a-re, no-shitik-a-pero-t-ati-i-ro, ajirik-a-tsomi-t-ak-i-mpi-ri? , n=aabak-a-ati-ye-mpa  
#      define AEpenthesisRule13 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => p _ [a|y|h] ]; # i-kant-ap-a-ak-e, i-tsop-a-ye-t-ak-e 
#      define AEpenthesisRule14 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => t _ [h|m|p|k|y] ]; # y-ant-a-jeí-t-ak-e, kant-a-mironta-ki-t-acha-ri, o-kant-a-pankaina-aty-a, o-kant-a-kintsi-t-ap-ak-a, o-=mat-a-yi-tz-i-ri-ni 
#      define AEpenthesisRule15 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => m _ [h|a|e|y] ]; # tim-a-jeí-atsi-ri, o-bam-a-ak-e, am-a-enka-ri, p-am-a-ye-t-ak-e-ro 
#      define AEpenthesisRule16 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => y _ [a|y|v|m] ]; # i-vary-a-ant-tz-i, a-ny-a-ye-tz-i-ri, katziy-a-vint-a-ri-ri, i-piy-a-macheve-t-an-ah-a 
#      define AEpenthesisRule17 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => n _ [v|a|t] ]; # i-kin-a-bae-t-i,  I-kemisan-t-a-jei-t-i-ri
                                                                       # kenakenatinkari / =kenaken -a -tinkari+m. / [=ken -a =ken] -a -tinkari+m. / [=to.walk -ep =to.walk] -ep -adj / ES: 'callejero' 
                                                                       # kenakenatinkaro / =kenaken -a -tinkaro+n.m. / [=ken -a =ken] -a -tinkari+n.m. / [=to.walk -ep =to.walk] -ep -adj / ES: 'callejera' 
#      define AEpenthesisRule18 [ ["@EP@"{a}"@EP"] => h _ [t|m] ]; # no-m-pirih-a-tsempeki-t-ak-e, sokih-a-mento-tsi 

#      define TEpenthesisRule1 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => i _ i ]; 
#      define TEpenthesisRule2 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => a _ a ]; 
#      define TEpenthesisRule3 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => e _ a ]; 
#      define TEpenthesisRule4 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => a _ e ]; 
#      define TEpenthesisRule5 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => o _ a ]; # Amitakotaantsi
#      define TEpenthesisRule6 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => i _ [a|e|y] ]; # Antabaitantsi, i-ñ-a-ashi-t-ya-ro-kia
#      define TEpenthesisRule7 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => e _ i ]; # Raniwaeti
#      define TEpenthesisRule8 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => o _ e ]; # aminakotero
#      define TEpenthesisRule9 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => a _ i ]; # o-kametsa-t-i
#      define TEpenthesisRule10 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => e _ [y|e] ]; # no-ñatsa-bae-t-ya, i-ñaashirink-a-jee-t-e-ri-ne
#      define TEpenthesisRule11 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => n _ [a|e|i|o|y] ]; # quemisan-t-atsi-ri, pi-n-quemisan-t-e-na-ji, i=shiron-t-yaa-ma  
#      define TEpenthesisRule12 [ ["@EP@"{t}] => o _ ["@EP"[i|y]] ]; # i=cameetsa-t-asano-t-i, i-n=kis-ako-t-ya-ro 
      #define TEpenthesisRule12 [ ~[ [~[?* o] "@EP@t@EP" ?*] | [?* "@EP@t@EP" ~[ [i|y] ?*]] ] ];
#      define TEpenthesisRule13 [ ["@EP@"{t}"@EP"] => y _ [a|e] ]; # i=mantsiy-t-apaent-e
									# This rule is not working for this entry: Ikinkishiriaka 
									# but for Ikinkishiritaka, for this reason we apply an optional rule

#      define TZEpenthesisRule1 [ ["@EP@"{tz}"@EP"] => e _ i ]; # ^EP IRREALIS ; 
#      define TZEpenthesisRule2 [ ["@EP@"{tz}"@EP"] => a _ i ]; 
#      define TZEpenthesisRule3 [ ["@EP@"{tz}"@EP"] => n _ i ]; 

      define TZEpenthesisRule4 [ t"@EP" (->) {tz}"@EP" || n _ i ]; # kant@EPi -> ocantzi
#      define TZEpenthesisRule5 [ ["@EP@"{tz}"@EP"] => i _ i ]; 
      define TZEpenthesisRule6 [ t"@EP" (->) {tz}"@EP" || i _ i ]; # p^atziri(tz)-imo(t)~an-ac—e-ri
#      define TZEpenthesisRule7 [ ["@EP@"{tz}"@EP"] => o _ i ]; 
      define TZEpenthesisRule8 [ t"@EP" (->) {tz}"@EP" || o _ i ]; # i-tsink-ako-tz-imaint-a-ro
#      define TSEpenthesisRule1 [ ["@EP@"{ts}"@EP"] => i _ i ];  # ts allophone to tz
                                                                 # n-amatawits-i-mi
#      define TSEpenthesisRule2 [ ["@EP@"{ts}"@EP"] => o _ [a|i] ];  # potso-ts-aantsi, ir=apato-ts-imai-t-ya-ri

      
#      define CleanUpEpenthesisRule6 [ "" (->) "@EP" || i _ {antsi} ]; # kinkishiriantsi
      
#      define EpEpRestr1 [ ["@EP@"[{a}|{ts}{tz}]] => ~["@EP@"[{a}|{ts}{tz}]] _ ];
      
       define Epenthesis [ 
#AEpenthesisRule1 .o. 
#AEpenthesisRule2 .o. 
#AEpenthesisRule3 .o. 
TZEpenthesisRule4 .o. 
TZEpenthesisRule6 .o. 
TZEpenthesisRule8 
];
#      define Epenthesis [ AEpenthesisRule1 .o. AEpenthesisRule2 .o. AEpenthesisRule3 .o. AEpenthesisRule4 .o. AEpenthesisRule5 .o. AEpenthesisRule6 
#.o. AEpenthesisRule7 .o. AEpenthesisRule8 .o. AEpenthesisRule9 .o. AEpenthesisRule10 .o. AEpenthesisRule11 .o. AEpenthesisRule12 .o. AEpenthesisRule13 .o. AEpenthesisRule14 .o. AEpenthesisRule15 .o. AEpenthesisRule16 
#.o. AEpenthesisRule17 .o. AEpenthesisRule18 
#.o. TEpenthesisRule1 .o. TEpenthesisRule2 .o. TEpenthesisRule3 .o. TEpenthesisRule4 .o. TEpenthesisRule5 .o. TEpenthesisRule6 .o. TEpenthesisRule7 .o. TEpenthesisRule8 .o. TEpenthesisRule9 .o. TEpenthesisRule10 .o. TEpenthesisRule11 .o. TEpenthesisRule12 .o. TEpenthesisRule13 
#.o. TZEpenthesisRule1 .o. TZEpenthesisRule2 .o. TZEpenthesisRule3 .o. TZEpenthesisRule4 .o. TZEpenthesisRule5 .o. TZEpenthesisRule6 .o. TZEpenthesisRule7 .o. TZEpenthesisRule8 
#.o. TSEpenthesisRule1 .o. TSEpenthesisRule2 
#.o. CleanUpEpenthesisRule6 ];
      
      # abaemantero / avaemantero /  
      define VCausativeAgentiveRule1 [ v"@AGTCAUS@"k (->) v"@AGTCAUS@" || [{o}] _ [{a}] ]; 
      define VCausativeAgentiveRule2 [ v"@AGTCAUS@"k (->) v"@AGTCAUS@" || [{a}|{i}]"@VPERS@" _ [{a}] ]; 
      define CausativeAgentive [VCausativeAgentiveRule1 .o. VCausativeAgentiveRule2 ]; 
      
      define IrrealisMidVoiceEmpaRule1 [ e"@EP" (->) "@EP" || [{r}] _ [{empa}] ];  
      
      ##########################
      #                        #
      #        Transitive      #
      #                        #
      ##########################
#       define TransSubj1 [ "[1SG.A+]" <- "[1SG.S+]" || _ ?* "[+1SG.O]"];
#       define TransSubj2 [ "[2SG.A+]" <- "[2SG.S+]" || _ ?* "[+2SG.O]"];
#       define TransSubj3 [ "[3SGm.A+]" <- "[3SGm.S+]" || _ ?* "[+3SGm.O]"];
#       define TransSubj4 [ "[3SGnm.A+]" <- "[3SGnm.S+]" || _ ?* "[+3SGnm.O]"];
#       define TransSubj5 [ "[1PL.A+]" <- "[1PL.S+]" || _ ?* "[+1PL.O]"];
#      define VerbRules TransSubj1 .o. TransSubj2 .o. TransSubj3 .o. TransSubj4 .o. TransSubj5 ;

#      source v-s-1.foma
#      source v-s-2.foma
#      source v-s-3.foma
#      source v-s-4.foma
#      source v-s-5.foma
#      source v-s-6.foma
#      source v-s-7.foma
      source verb.classifier.prq.foma
      source verb.composition.prq.foma
      source verb.composition.len.prq.foma
      source verb.suffix.prq.script
	  
	  source verb.transitions.modalformative.script
      source verb.transitions.prq.script

#      define S [ (V=S=1) (V=S=2) (V=S=3) (V=S=4) ]; #(V=S=3) (S=4) (S=5) (S=6) (S=7)] ;
      define Suff [S] ;

      ####################################
      #                                  #
      #   Subject / Agent ... Object     #
      #     Restricctions                #
      #                                  #
      ####################################
      # S .. is accepted
      
      # not accepting the incorrect combinations S .. O deprecated 
      #define TransSubjRestr1 [~$["@1SG.S"?*["@1SG.O"|"@2SG.O"|"@3m.O"|"@3n.m.O"|"@1PL.O"]]];
      #define TransSubjRestr2 [~$["@2S"?*["@1SG.O"|"@2SG.O"|"@3m.O"|"@3n.m.O"|"@1PL.O"]]];
      #define TransSubjRestr3 [~$["@3m.S"?*["@1SG.O"|"@2SG.O"|"@3m.O"|"@3n.m.O"|"@1PL.O"]]];
      #define TransSubjRestr4 [~$["@3n.m.S"?*["@1SG.O"|"@2SG.O"|"@3m.O"|"@3n.m.O"|"@1PL.O"]]];
      #define TransSubjRestr5 [~$["@1PL.S"?*["@1SG.O"|"@2SG.O"|"@3m.O"|"@3n.m.O"|"@1PL.O"]]];
     #define MINSUFFIX  [~$[ ?*"--"?* ] ]; 
      #define PrnSubject ["@1SG.S"|"@2S"|"@3m.S"|"@3n.m.S"|"@1PL.S"];
      #define PrnAgent ["@1SG.A"|"@2A"|"@3m.A"|"@3n.m.A"|"@1PL.A"];
      #define PrnObject ["@1SG.O"|"@2SG.O"|"@3m.O"|"@3n.m.O"|"@1PL.O"];
      #define TransAgentWithoutObject ~[[PrnAgent ?*] & [?* PrnObject]];
      #define TransSubjectWithObject ~[[PrnSubject ?*] & [?* PrnObject]];
     #define VerbFeatRestr [TransSubjRestr1 .o. TransSubjRestr2 .o. TransSubjRestr3 .o. TransSubjRestr4 .o. TransSubjRestr5] ;
      #define VerbFeatRestr [TransSubjRestr1 .o. TransSubjRestr2 .o. TransSubjRestr3 .o. TransSubjRestr4 .o. TransSubjRestr5 .o. TransAgentWithoutObject .o. TransSubjectWithObject] ;

      define MPRestr1 [ ["@MP@"] => {m} _ {p} ]; # IRREALIS PREFIX
      define NVowelRestr1 [ ["@NVowel@"] => {n} _ [{p}|{py}|{t}|{ty}|{k}|{ky}|{s}|{sh}|{ch}|{ts}|{tz}|{h}|{m}|{n}|{ny}|{r}|{ry}|{v}|{y}] ]; ! n, p should be omitted ? # IRREALIS PREFIX
      define PersPrefixRestr1 [ Cons => .#. ~[[{h}|{n}|{p}|{r}]"@VPERS@"] _ ];
      define PersPrefixRestr2 [ [{o}] => .#. ~[[{pi}]"@VPERS@"] _ ]; 
      define AgentiveCausativeRestr1 [ [{o}]"@AGTCAUS@" => .#. ~[[{n}]"@VPERS@"] _ ]; # no examples available, but it causes a lot of overgeneration that's why it should be regulated  
      
      define VerbFeatRestr [ MPRestr1 .o. NVowelRestr1 .o. PersPrefixRestr1 .o. PersPrefixRestr2 .o. AgentiveCausativeRestr1 ] ; 

      #source vroot.prq.foma
      #source vroot.es.foma
      #source n-vroot.prq.group1.foma 
      define vsyllable ConsRoot* VowelRoot^{1,2} ConsRoot*;
        define VRootPRQ [ ["[="] :0 ] [ vsyllable+ ] [ ["+GUESS][VRoot]"] :0 ] ;

#      define Verb VerbFeatRestr .o. VerbRules .o. [ (Pref) [VRootPRQ] (Suff) ] .o. Epenthesis;

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #          Nouns         #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      source n-p-1.foma
      define NPref [(N=P=1)] ;
